Washington statutes.
RCW 39.112.020

Conditions for using state land improvement financing.

A city may finance public improvements using state land improvement financing subject to the following conditions:

(1) The city has adopted an ordinance designating a state land improvement financing area within its boundaries and specified the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use of state land improvement financing.

(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using state land improvement financing are expected to encourage private development within the state land improvement financing area and to increase the fair market value of real property within the state land improvement financing area.

(3) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the state land improvement financing area, as a result of the public improvements, will be consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the city's comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW.

[ 2016 c 192 s 2.]